Massachusetts, session 194th, H1175.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 5 of chapter 175A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after the word “expenses”, in line 26, the following words:-
An insurer shall not adjust the rate of a homeowner policy because on a claim of fire,
theft, storm or water damage where the insured is found to be not at fault.
of 1